Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4035.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 49, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 4, chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 49. As used in sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024:
(1) “Net [residential] buildable acre” means an acre of [residentially] designated buildable land,
including for residential uses or uses designated under section 55 (3)(b), chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024, but not including rights of way for streets, roads or utilities or areas not designated for
development due to natural resource protections or environmental constraints.
(2) “Site” means a lot or parcel or any combination of lots and parcels that are contiguous or
separated from one another by a street or road with or without common ownership.
SECTION 2. Section 50, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 50. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS chapter 197A, a city outside of Metro
may add a site to the city’s urban growth boundary under sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act], if:
(a) The site is adjacent to the existing urban growth boundary of the city or is separated from
the existing urban growth boundary by only a street or road;
(b) The site is:
(A) Designated as an urban reserve under ORS 197A.230 to 197A.250, including a site whose
designation is adopted under ORS 197.652 to 197.658;
(B) Designated as nonresource land; [or]
(C) Subject to an acknowledged exception to a statewide land use planning goal relating to
farmland or forestland; or
(D) Other land, only if:
(i) Resource land constitutes more than 80 percent of the land area lying within a quarter
mile outside the city’s urban growth boundary;
(ii) Upon the city’s review under section 54 (1), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, there
were no qualified applications for lands described in subparagraphs (A) to (C) of this para-
graph; and
(iii) Of the qualified applications received by the city, the site is the highest priority,
based on the prioritization described in ORS 197A.285;
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 1

(c) The city has not previously adopted an urban growth boundary amendment or exchange un-
der sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act];
(d) The city has demonstrated a need for the addition under section 52, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act];
(e) The city has requested and received an application as required under sections 53 and 54,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act];
(f) The total acreage of the site:
(A) For a city with a population of 25,000 or greater, [does not exceed 100] includes up to 150
net [residential] buildable acres; or
(B) For a city with a population of less than 25,000, [does not exceed] includes up to 50 net
[residential] buildable acres; and
(g)(A) The city has adopted a binding conceptual plan for the site that satisfies the requirements
of section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act]; or
(B) The added site does not exceed 15 net [residential] buildable acres and satisfies the re-
quirements of section 56, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act].
(2) A county shall approve an amendment to an urban growth boundary made under this section
that complies with sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, [of this 2024 Act] and shall
cooperate with a city to facilitate the coordination of functions under ORS 195.020 to facilitate the
city’s annexation and the development of the site. The county’s decision is not a land use decision.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 197.626, an action by a local government under sections 49 to 59,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, [of this 2024 Act] is not a land use decision as defined in ORS
197.015.
SECTION 3. Section 51, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 51. (1) A city within Metro may petition Metro to add a site within the Metro urban
growth boundary if the site:
(a) Satisfies the requirements of section 50 (1), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024
Act]; and
(b) Is designated as an urban reserve.
(2)(a) Within 120 days of receiving a petition under this section, Metro shall determine whether
the site would substantially comply with the applicable provisions of sections 49 to 59, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act].
(b) If Metro determines that a petition does not substantially comply, Metro shall:
(A) Notify the city of deficiencies in the petition, specifying sufficient detail to allow the city
to remedy any deficiency in a subsequent resubmittal; and
(B) Allow the city to amend its conceptual plan and resubmit it as a petition to Metro under
this section.
(c) If Metro determines that a petition does comply, notwithstanding any other provision of ORS
chapter 197A, Metro shall adopt amendments to its urban growth boundary to include the site in
the petition, unless the amendment would result in more than 300 total net [residential] buildable
acres added under this subsection.
(3) If the net [residential] buildable acres included in petitions that Metro determines are in
compliance on or before July 1, 2025, total less than 300 net [residential] buildable acres, Metro
shall adopt amendments to its urban growth boundary under subsection (2)(c) of this section:
(a) On or before November 1, 2025, for all petitions deemed compliant on or before July 1, 2025;
or
(b) Within 120 days after a petition is deemed compliant after July 1, 2025, in the order in which
the petitions are received.
(4) If the net [residential] buildable acres included in petitions that Metro determines are in
compliance on or before July 1, 2025, total 300 or more net [residential] buildable acres, on or before
January 1, 2027, Metro shall adopt amendments to its urban growth boundary under subsection (2)(c)
of this section to include the sites in those petitions that Metro determines will:
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 2

(a) Best comply with the provisions of section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024
Act]; and
(b) Maximize the development of needed housing.
(5) Metro may not conduct a hearing to review or select petitions or adopt amendments to its
urban growth boundary under this section.
SECTION 4. Section 52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 5, chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 52. A city may not add, or petition to add, a site under sections 49 to 59, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2024, unless:
(1) The city has demonstrated a need for additional land based on the following factors:
(a)(A) In the previous 20 years there have been no urban growth boundary expansions for resi-
dential use adopted by a city or by Metro in a location adjacent to the city; and
(B) The city does not have within the existing urban growth boundary a tract that:
(i) Is larger than 20 net [residential] buildable acres;
[(ii) Is undeveloped; and]
(ii) Contains no permanent buildings;
(iii) Is not adjacent to improved public utilities that are suitable for immediate con-
nection at the property line;
(iv) Has not received final approval of any land use entitlements, development approvals,
subdivision plats, site plans or building permits; and
[(iii)] (v) Consists of one or more lots or parcels with or without common ownership and that
abut each other or are separated by only a street or a road; or
(b) Within urban growth boundary expansion areas for residential use adopted by the city over
the previous 20 years, or by Metro in locations adjacent to the city, 75 percent of the lands either:
(A) Are developed; or
(B) Have an acknowledged comprehensive plan with land use designations in preparation for
annexation and have a public facilities plan and associated financing plan.
(2) The city has demonstrated a need for affordable housing, based on:
(a) Having a greater percentage of [severely] cost-burdened households than the average for this
state based on the [Comprehensive Housing Affordability Strategy data from the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development] most recent American Community Survey five-
year estimate data from the United States Census Bureau; or
(b) At least 25 percent of the renter households in the city being [severely] rent burdened as
indicated under the most recent [housing equity indicator data under ORS 456.602 (2)(g)] American
Community Survey five-year estimate data from the United States Census Bureau.
(3) The evaluation of the demonstrations required under this section and the evaluation of cri-
teria in an application under sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, must be based on
the evidence, data and factors as of the time a public notice is issued under section 53 (1), chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 5. Section 53, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 53. (1) Before a city may select a site for inclusion within the city’s or Metro’s urban
growth boundary under sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act], a city
must provide public notice that includes:
(a) The city’s intention to select a site for inclusion within the city’s urban growth boundary.
(b) Each basis under which the city has determined that it qualifies to include a site under
section 52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act].
(c) A deadline for submission of applications under this section that is at least 45 days following
the date of the notice.
(d) Additional substantive requirements, including a minimum size for a site, as estab-
lished by the city and not incompatible with sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
[(d)] (e) A description of the information, form and format required of an application, including
the requirements of section 55 (2), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act].
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 3

(2) A copy of the notice of intent under this section must be provided to:
(a) Each county in which the city resides;
(b) Each special district providing urban services within the city’s urban growth boundary;
(c) The Department of Land Conservation and Development; and
(d) Metro, if the city is within Metro.
SECTION 6. Section 54, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 54. (1) After the deadline for submission of applications established under section [55 of this
2024 Act] 53, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, the city shall:
(a) Review applications filed for compliance with sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws
2024 [of this 2024 Act].
(b) For each completed application that complies with sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act], provide notice to the residents of the proposed site area who were not
signatories to the application.
(c) Provide opportunities for public participation in selecting a site, including, at least:
(A) One public comment period;
(B)(i) One meeting of the city’s planning commission at which public testimony is considered;
(ii) One meeting of the city’s council at which public testimony is considered; or
(iii) One public open house; and
(C) Notice on the city’s website or published in a paper of record at least 14 days before:
(i) A meeting under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph; and
(ii) The beginning of a comment period under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(d) Consult with, request necessary information from and provide the opportunity for written
comment from:
(A) The owners of each lot or parcel within the site;
(B) If the city does not currently exercise land use jurisdiction over the entire site, the gov-
erning body of each county with land use jurisdiction over the site;
(C) Any special district that provides urban services to the site; and
(D) Any public or private utility that provides utilities to the site.
(2) An application filed under this section must:
(a) Be completed for each property owner or group of property owners that are proposing an
urban growth boundary amendment under sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this
2024 Act];
(b) Be in writing in a form and format as required by the city;
(c) Specify the lots or parcels that are the subject of the application;
(d) Be signed by all owners of lots or parcels included within the application; and
(e) Include each owner’s signed consent to annexation of the properties if the site is added to
the urban growth boundary.
(3) If the city has received approval from all property owners of such lands, in writing in a form
and format specified by the city, the governing body of the city may select an application and the
city shall adopt a conceptual plan as described in section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, [of
this 2024 Act] for all or a portion of the lands contained within the application.
(4) A conceptual plan adopted under subsection (3) of this section must include findings identi-
fying reasons for inclusion of lands within the conceptual plan and reasons why lands, if any, sub-
mitted as part of an application that was partially approved were not included within the conceptual
plan.
SECTION 7. Section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 6, chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 55. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable units” means residential units described in subsection (3)(f)(A) or (4) of this
section.
(b) “Market rate units” means residential units other than affordable units.
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 4

(2) Before adopting an urban growth boundary amendment under section 50, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024, or petitioning Metro under section 51, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, for a site larger
than 15 net [residential] buildable acres, a city shall adopt a binding conceptual plan as an amend-
ment to its comprehensive plan.
(3) The conceptual plan must:
(a) Establish the total net [residential] buildable acres within the site and must require for those
residential areas:
(A) A diversity of housing types and sizes, including middle housing, accessible housing and
other needed housing;
(B) That the development will be on lands zoned for residential or mixed-use residential uses;
and
(C) The residential development will be built at net residential densities not less than:
(i) Seventeen dwelling units per net [residential] buildable acre if sited within the Metro urban
growth boundary;
(ii) Ten units per net [residential] buildable acre if sited in a city with a population of 30,000
or greater;
(iii) Six units per net [residential] buildable acre if sited in a city with a population of 2,500 or
greater and less than 30,000; or
(iv) Five units per net [residential] buildable acre if sited in a city with a population less than
2,500;
(b) Designate within the site:
(A) Recreation and open space lands; and
(B) Lands for commercial uses, either separate or as a mixed use, that:
(i) Primarily serve the immediate surrounding housing;
(ii) Provide goods and services at a smaller scale than provided on typical lands zoned for
commercial use; and
(iii) Are provided at the minimum amount necessary to support and integrate viable commercial
and residential uses;
(c) If the city has a population of 5,000 or greater, include a transportation network for the site
that provides diverse transportation options, including walking, bicycling and transit use if public
transit services are available, as well as sufficient connectivity to existing and planned transporta-
tion network facilities as shown in the local government’s transportation system plan as defined in
Land Conservation and Development Commission rules;
(d) Demonstrate that protective measures will be applied to the site consistent with the state-
wide land use planning goals for:
(A) Open spaces, scenic and historic areas or natural resources;
(B) Air, water and land resources quality;
(C) Areas subject to natural hazards;
(D) The Willamette River Greenway;
(E) Estuarine resources;
(F) Coast shorelands; or
(G) Beaches and dunes;
(e) Include assurances that the site will be served with all necessary urban services as defined
in ORS 195.065, including through:
(A) Agreements among the city, each owner within the site and any other necessary public or
private utility provider, local government or district, as defined in ORS 195.060, or combination of
local governments and districts;
(B) Letters from utility providers showing a capacity and willingness to provide services; or
(C) Equivalent assurances; and
(f) Include requirements that ensure that:
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 5

(A) At least 30 percent of the residential units are subject to affordability restrictions, including
but not limited to affordable housing covenants, as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295, that require
for a period of not less than 60 years that the units be:
(i) Available for rent, with or without government assistance, by households with an income of
80 percent or less of the area median income as defined in ORS 456.270; or
(ii) Available for purchase, with or without government assistance, by households with an in-
come of 130 percent or less of the area median income;
(B) The construction of all affordable units has commenced before the city issues certificates
of occupancy to the last 15 percent of market rate units;
(C) All common areas and amenities are equally available to residents of affordable units and
of market rate units and properties designated for affordable units are dispersed throughout the site;
and
(D) The requirement for affordable housing units is recorded before the building permits are is-
sued for any property within the site, and the requirements contain financial penalties for noncom-
pliance.
(4) A city may require greater affordability requirements for residential units than are required
under subsection (3)(f)(A) of this section, provided that the city significantly and proportionally off-
sets development costs related to:
(a) Permits or fees;
(b) System development charges;
(c) Property taxes; or
(d) Land acquisition and predevelopment costs.
SECTION 8. Section 56, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 56. (1) A city that intends to add 15 net [residential] buildable acres or less is not required
to adopt a conceptual plan under section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, [of this 2024 Act] if
the city has entered into:
(a) Enforceable and recordable agreements with each landowner of a property within the site
to ensure that the site will comply with the affordability requirements described in section 55
(3)(f), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act]; and
(b) A binding agreement with each owner within the site and any other necessary public or
private utility provider, local government or district, as defined in ORS 195.060, or combination of
local governments and districts to ensure that the site will be served with all necessary urban ser-
vices as defined in ORS 195.065.
(2) This section does not apply to a city within Metro.
SECTION 9. Section 2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 2. (1) In lieu of amending its urban growth boundary under any other process provided by
sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, the City of Monmouth may amend its urban
growth boundary to add one or more sites to the urban growth boundary and to remove one or more
tracts of land from the urban growth boundary as provided in this section.
(2) The area to be removed under this section:
(a) May not exceed 90 acres;
(b) Must have more than one-quarter of its acreage within an area mapped as flood hazard or
wetland;
(c) May not have been annexed by the city;
(d) Must be designated for residential use on the city’s comprehensive plan map; and
(e) May not be currently served by city sewer service.
(3) The site to be added under this section:
(a) May not exceed 75 net [residential] buildable acres;
(b) Must be contiguous to the boundary of the city and the city’s existing urban growth bound-
ary;
(c) May not have more than 25 percent of its acreage within an area mapped as a flood hazard
or wetland;
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 6

(d) Must be able to connect to nearby water and sewer services; and
(e) Must be owned by owners that have consented to having the site:
(A) Added to the urban growth boundary; and
(B) Annexed by the city.
(4) Land may be removed from an urban growth boundary under this section without landowner
consent. ORS 195.305 to 195.336 do not apply to the removal of land from the urban growth boundary
under this section.
(5) Review of an exchange of lands made under this section may only be made by the county
as provided in section 50 (2), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, and by the Department of Land Con-
servation and Development, subject to judicial review, as provided in section 57, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2024.
(6)(a) Sections 52, 53, 54, 55 and 56, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, do not apply to a site ad-
dition made under this section.
(b) A site addition made under this section is not required to meet the conditions listed in sec-
tion 50 (1)(a) to (g), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 10. Section 11 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of sections 49 to 59,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 11. (1) The City of Woodburn, when adding a site to the city’s urban growth
boundary under sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024:
(a) Is not required to comply with the selection conditions in section 50 (1)(b)(D)(ii) or
(iii), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(b) Is not required to solicit submission of applications or otherwise comply with section
50 (1)(e) or 53, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, provided that the city deliver a notice to
Marion County, the Department of Land Conservation and Development and any special dis-
trict providing urban services within the city’s urban growth boundary upon receipt of an
application.
(c) May demonstrate need under section 52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as of the date
of the delivery of the notice under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) May approve a site upon receipt of an application without subjecting the site to any
of the processes under section 54 (1), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(e) Is not required to adopt a binding conceptual plan under section 50 (1)(g), 54 (3) or
55 (2), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, before adding a site to the city’s urban growth
boundary under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(f) May select a site application that complies with section 54 (2), chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024, and, following submission under paragraph (h)(A) of this subsection and approval
under subsection (2) of this section, add the site to the city’s urban growth boundary.
(g) For a site added under paragraph (f) of this subsection, shall adopt a master plan
that, following submission under paragraph (h)(B) of this subsection and approval under
subsection (2) of this section, must be applied to the site upon annexation of the site. The
master plan must:
(A) Meet any requirements applicable to a conceptual plan under section 55 (3), chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024; and
(B) Require no fewer than 600 residential units to be developed on the site.
(h) Shall have the city’s site selection reviewed, in lieu of the approval procedures set
forth in section 57, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, by submitting to the department:
(A) The selected site application and proposed amendment to the city’s urban growth
boundary under paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection at least 30 days prior to the adoption
of the amendment.
(B) A master plan for the site described in paragraph (g) of this subsection at least 30
days prior to an annexation hearing for any property included in the site.
(i) Shall comply with an order by the department under subsection (2) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 7

(2)(a) The department shall review the submittals under subsection (1)(h) of this section
for compliance with the provisions of sections 49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, and:
(A) If a submittal substantially complies with the provisions of sections 49 to 59, chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024, issue an order approving the submittal; or
(B) If a submittal does not substantially comply with the provisions of sections 49 to 59,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, issue an order remanding the submittal to the city with a
specific determination of deficiencies in the submittal and with sufficient detail to identify a
specific remedy for any deficiency in a subsequent resubmittal.
(b) The department must issue an order within 30 days of the delivery of a submittal
under subsection (1)(h) of this section.
(c) An order issued by the department under this subsection is subject to appeal as de-
scribed in section 57 (4), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 12. Section 60, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 4, chapter 341,
Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 60. (1) [Sections] Section 49 [to 56, 58 and 59], chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, [are] as
amended by section 4, chapter 530, Oregon Laws 2025, and section 1 of this 2026 Act, is re-
pealed on January 2, 2033.
(2) Section 50, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 2 of this 2026 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(3) Section 51, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 3 of this 2026 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(4) Section 52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 5, chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, and section 4 of this 2026 Act, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(5) Section 53, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 5 of this 2026 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(6) Section 54, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 6 of this 2026 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(7) Section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 6, chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, and section 7 of this 2026 Act, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(8) Section 56, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 8 of this 2026 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
[(2)] (9) Section 57, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 3 [of this 2025 Act],
chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, and section 7, chapter 530, Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed on
January 2, 2033.
(10) Section 58, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 8, chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(11) Section 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
[(3)] (12) Section 2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, as amended by section 9 of this 2026
Act, [of this 2025 Act] is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(13) Section 11 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2033.
SECTION 13. ORS 197.045 is amended to read:
197.045. The Land Conservation and Development Commission may:
(1) Apply for and receive moneys from the federal government and from this state or any of its
agencies or departments.
(2) Contract with or issue grants to any public agency for the performance of services or the
exchange of employees or services by one to the other necessary in carrying out ORS chapters 195,
196, 197 and 197A.
(3) Contract for the services of and consultation with professional persons or organizations, not
otherwise available through federal, state and local governmental agencies, in carrying out its du-
ties under ORS chapters 195, 196, 197 and 197A.
(4) Perform other functions, including issuing grants, required to carry out ORS chapters 195,
196, 197 and 197A.
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 8

(5) Assist in development and preparation of model land use regulations to guide state agencies,
cities, counties and special districts in implementing goals.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, review comprehensive plan and land use regu-
lations related to the identification and designation of high-value farmland pursuant to chapter 792,
Oregon Laws 1993, under procedures set forth in ORS 197.251.
SECTION 14. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 18, 2026 Received by Governor:
Repassed by House March 4, 2026 ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
..................................................................................
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate ..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-B) Page 9